Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 25. Ground Water Management Act of 1992.

§ 62.1-254.
Findings and purpose.

The General Assembly hereby determines and finds that, pursuant to the Groundwater Act of 1973, the continued, unrestricted usage of ground water is contributing and will contribute to pollution and shortage of ground water, thereby jeopardizing the public welfare, safety and health.
It is the purpose of this Act to recognize and declare that the right to reasonable control of all ground water resources within this Commonwealth belongs to the public and that in order to conserve, protect and beneficially utilize the ground water of this Commonwealth and to ensure the public welfare, safety and health, provision for management and control of ground water resources is essential.

History.

1992, c. 812.

Cross references.

As to the issuance of general permits under this section being exempt from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4006

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 812, which enacted this chapter, the Ground Water Management Act of 1992, provided in cls. 3 through 6 that certain amounts of water should be withdrawn from the Roanoke River at Lake Gaston for additional public water supply by the City of Virginia Beach; that the City of Virginia Beach should pay certain amounts for such water to the Southside Infrastructure Fund provided that all suits were dismissed as prescribed; that the Southside Infrastructure Commission be established as a body politic with certain powers and duties; that the money in the fund should be allocated among the political subdivisions which appoint members of the commission; and that the above clauses should not become effective unless the member jurisdictions approved the terms of this act. As of July 1, 2001, the member jurisdictions had not approved the terms of the act; therefore, the above clauses will not become effective.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-711.1 Commercial Credit Line Deed of Trust, Assignment of Leases and Security Agreement; No. 16-819 Hazardous Materials.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M. J. Waters and Watercourses, § 3.

§ 62.1-255.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Agricultural irrigation”
means irrigation that is used to support any operation devoted to the bona fide production of crops, animals, or fowl, including the production of fruits and vegetables of any kind; meat, dairy, and poultry products; nuts, tobacco, nursery, and floral products; and the production and harvest of products from silvicultural activity.

“Beneficial use”
includes domestic (including public water supply), agricultural, commercial, and industrial uses.

“Board”
means the State Water Control Board. However, when used outside the context of the promulgation of regulations, including regulations to establish general permits, pursuant to this chapter, “Board” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Area”
means the ground water management area declared by the Board encompassing the Counties of Accomack and Northampton.

“Ground water”
means any water, except capillary moisture, beneath the land surface in the zone of saturation or beneath the bed of any stream, lake, reservoir or other body of surface water wholly or partially within the boundaries of the Commonwealth, whatever the subsurface geologic structure in which such water stands, flows, percolates or otherwise occurs.

“Ground water withdrawal permit”
means a certificate issued by the Board permitting the withdrawal of a specified quantity of ground water in a ground water management area.

“Irrigation”
means the controlled application of water through man-made systems to supply water requirements not satisfied by rainfall to assist in the growing or maintenance of vegetative growth.

“Nonagricultural irrigation”
means all irrigation other than agricultural irrigation.

“Person”
means any and all persons, including individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, public or private institutions, municipalities or political subdivisions, governmental agencies, or private or public corporations organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or any other state or country.

“Surficial aquifer”
means the upper surface of a zone of saturation, where the body of ground water is not confined by an overlying impermeable zone.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2018, c. 427; 2019, c. 755; 2020, c. 670; 2022, c. 356.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 427 added the definitions of “Department” and “Surficial aquifer.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 755, in the definition for “Beneficial use,” deleted “but is not limited to” preceding “domestic”; inserted the definition for “Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Area”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 670 inserted the definitions for “Agricultural irrigation,” “Irrigation,” and “Nonagricultural irrigation.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 added the second sentence in the definition of “Board.”

§ 62.1-255.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the Board or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 62.1-256.
Duties of Board.

The Board shall have the following duties and powers:

To issue ground water withdrawal permits in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board;

To issue special orders as provided in §

62.1-268

;

To study, investigate and assess ground water resources and all problems concerned with the quality and quantity of ground water located wholly or partially in the Commonwealth, and to make such reports and recommendations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

To require any person withdrawing ground water for any purpose anywhere in the Commonwealth, whether or not declared to be a ground water management area, to furnish to the Board such information with regard to such ground water withdrawal and the use thereof as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, excluding ground water withdrawals occurring in conjunction with activities related to exploration for and production of oil, gas, coal or other minerals regulated by the Department of Energy;

To prescribe and enforce requirements that naturally flowing wells be plugged or destroyed, or be capped or equipped with valves so that flow of ground water may be completely stopped when said ground water is not currently being applied to a beneficial use;

To enter at reasonable times and under reasonable circumstances, any establishment or upon any property, public or private, for the purposes of obtaining information, conducting surveys or inspections, or inspecting wells and springs, and to duly authorize agents to do the same, to ensure compliance with any permits, standards, policies, rules, regulations, rulings and special orders which it may adopt, issue or establish to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

To issue special exceptions pursuant to §

62.1-267

;

To adopt such regulations as it deems necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter; and

To delegate to its Executive Director any of the powers and duties invested in it to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter except the adoption and promulgation of rules, standards or regulations; the revocation of permits; and the issuance, modification, or revocation of orders except in case of an emergency as provided in subsection B of §

62.1-268

.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” in subdivision 4.

§ 62.1-256.1.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Former §

62.1-256.1

, relating to the Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Advisory Committee, was enacted by Acts 2015, cc. 262 and 613, and expired January 1, 2018, pursuant to Acts 2015, cc. 262 and 613, cl. 2.

Acts 2018, c. 448, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That a groundwater trading work group is established for the purpose of serving as a resource to the Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) by further studying how to implement the recommendation, made by the Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Advisory Committee (the EVGMAC), established pursuant to Chapters 262 and 613 of the Acts of Assembly of 2015, that an aquifer storage and recovery banking system be developed. The work group shall also conduct further study and identify the components of a groundwater trading program. The work group shall consist of the members of the Trading Work Group of the EVGMAC. The work group shall appoint a chair and report its recommendations, including recommended program components, to the State Water Commission and the Director of the Department no later than July 1, 2020. The work group shall include in its discussions input from groundwater users interested in purchasing credits and representatives from local governing bodies currently injecting water into the Coastal Aquifers or considering a project to do so.”

§ 62.1-256.2.
(Expires July 1, 2025) Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Advisory Committee established; sunset.

The Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) shall establish the Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Advisory Committee (the Committee) as an advisory committee to assist the State Water Commission and the Department in the management of groundwater in the Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Area. Members of the Committee shall be appointed by the Director of the Department and shall be composed of nonlegislative citizen members consisting of representatives of industrial and municipal water users; representatives of public and private water providers; developers and representatives from the economic development community; representatives of agricultural, conservation, and environmental organizations; state and federal agency officials; and university faculty and citizens with expertise in water resources-related issues. The Department shall convene the Committee at least four times each fiscal year. Members of the Committee shall receive no compensation for their service and shall not be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

During each meeting of the Committee, the Department shall (i) update the Committee on activities pertaining to groundwater management in the Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Area and (ii) solicit members to present topics and analysis for examination at future meetings. The Committee may develop specific statutory, budgetary, and regulatory recommendations, as necessary, to enhance the effectiveness of groundwater management in the Eastern Virginia Groundwater Management Area.

The Department shall annually report the results of the Committee’s examinations and related recommendations, and any responses from the Department, to the State Water Commission, the Governor, and the General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year.

The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2025.

History.

2020, c. 805.

§ 62.1-257.
When Board may initiate a ground water management area study proceeding; hearing required.

The Board upon its own motion or, in its discretion, upon receipt of a petition by any county, city or town within the area in question, may initiate a ground water management area proceeding, whenever in its judgment there may be reason to believe that:

Ground water levels in the area are declining or are expected to decline excessively;

The wells of two or more ground water users within the area are interfering or may reasonably be expected to interfere substantially with one another;

The available ground water supply has been or may be overdrawn; or

The ground water in the area has been or may become polluted. Such pollution includes any alteration of the physical, chemical or biological properties of ground water which has a harmful or detrimental effect on the quality or quantity of such waters.

If the Board finds that any one of the conditions required above exists, and further finds that the public welfare, safety and health require that regulatory efforts be initiated, the Board shall by regulation declare the area in question to be a ground water management area. The Board shall include in its regulation a definition of the boundaries of the ground water management area. The Board shall mail a copy of the regulation to the mayor or chairman of the governing body of each county, city or town within which any part of the area lies.

History.

1992, c. 812.

§ 62.1-258.
Use of ground water in ground water management area; registration of well construction required.

It is unlawful in a ground water management area for any person to withdraw, attempt to withdraw, or allow the withdrawal of any ground water, other than in accordance with a ground water withdrawal permit or as provided in §

62.1-259

, subsections C, D and F of §

62.1-260

, and subsection C of §

62.1-261

. Each private well, as defined in §

32.1-176.3

, constructed in a ground water management area shall be registered by the certified water well systems provider with the Board within 30 days of the completion of the construction. Such registration shall be in a format prescribed by the Board; however, the Board and the Board of Health shall develop joint private well forms and processes. The Department of Health shall provide the Board annually with a list of private wells that have received permits during the previous year. The list shall include each well’s characteristics and location. The Board shall provide the Department of Health annually with a list of wells registered during the previous year.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2015, c. 465.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 465 substituted “It is” for “It shall be” at the beginning and added the last five sentences.

§ 62.1-258.1.
Irrigation wells for nonagricultural use prohibited; exceptions.

Unless the Department of Environmental Quality has determined that the quantity or quality of the ground water in the surficial aquifer is not adequate to supply the proposed beneficial use, it shall be unlawful in a ground water management area for any person to construct a well for nonagricultural irrigation purposes except in the surficial aquifer. The provisions of this section shall not apply to wells constructed prior to the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to subsection H of §

62.1-266

.

History.

2020, c. 670.

§ 62.1-259.
Certain withdrawals; permit not required.

No ground water withdrawal permit shall be required for (i) withdrawals of less than 300,000 gallons a month; (ii) temporary construction dewatering; (iii) temporary withdrawals associated with a state-approved ground water remediation; (iv) the withdrawal of ground water for use by a ground water heat pump where the discharge is reinjected into the aquifer from which it is withdrawn; (v) the withdrawal from a pond recharged by ground water without mechanical assistance; (vi) the withdrawal of water for geophysical investigations, including pump tests; (vii) the withdrawal of ground water coincident with exploration for and extraction of coal or activities associated with coal mining regulated by the Department of Energy; (viii) the withdrawal of ground water coincident with the exploration for or production of oil, gas or other minerals other than coal, unless such withdrawal adversely impacts aquifer quantity or quality or other ground water users within a ground water management area; (ix) the withdrawal of ground water in any area not declared a ground water management area; or (x) the withdrawal of ground water pursuant to a special exception issued by the Board.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” in clause (vii).

§ 62.1-259.1.
Certain withdrawals; technical evaluation required.

The developer of a subdivision, as defined in §

15.2-2201

, located in a designated ground water management area shall apply for a technical evaluation from the Department of Environmental Quality prior to final subdivision plat approval if there will be 30 or more lots within the subdivision served by private wells, as defined in §

32.1-176.3

. The application for a technical evaluation shall be on a form established by the Department and shall include a geophysical log from a geophysical borehole located within the subdivision. Such borehole may subsequently be utilized as a ground water supply for a dwelling unit or for other appropriate purpose within the subdivision. Within 60 days of receiving a complete application for a technical evaluation, the Department shall perform a technical evaluation and provide to the developer a recommendation sufficient to serve the water needs of each dwelling unit in the subdivision that specifies the aquifer or aquifers that will minimize unmitigated impacts to ground water resources and any offsite impacts to existing ground water users. The recommendation to the developer shall be nonbinding; however, any such developer who constructs one or more private wells in the subdivision in an aquifer inconsistent with the Department’s recommendation shall prepare and submit a mitigation plan to the Department, consistent with requirements for mitigation plans established by the Board, and record a mitigation plan approved by the Department with the subdivision plat prior to constructing any private wells within the subdivision. The Department is authorized to charge the developer a fee not to exceed $5,000 to perform the technical evaluation. This section shall not apply to the developer of a subdivision who constructs all of the private wells within the subdivision in the surficial aquifer.

History.

2018, c. 427.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 427, cl. 2 provides: “That the technical evaluation requirement of this act applies to any such subdivision for which the developer obtains plat approval on or after July 1, 2018.”

§ 62.1-260.
Permits for existing ground water withdrawals in existing ground water management areas.

Persons holding a certificate of ground water right or a permit to withdraw ground water issued prior to July 1, 1991, in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas and currently withdrawing ground water pursuant to said certificate or permit shall file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit on or before December 31, 1992, in order to obtain a permit for withdrawals. The Board shall issue ground water withdrawal permits for the total amount of ground water withdrawn during any consecutive twelve-month period between July 1, 1987, and June 30, 1992, together with such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation; however, with respect to a political subdivision, an authority serving a political subdivision or a community waterworks regulated by the Department of Health, the permit shall be issued for the total amount of ground water withdrawn during any consecutive twelve-month period between July 1, 1980, and June 30, 1992, together with such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation.

Persons holding a certificate of ground water right issued on or after July 1, 1991, and prior to July 1, 1992, in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas and currently withdrawing ground water pursuant to the certificate shall file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit on or before December 31, 1993, in order to obtain a permit for withdrawals. The Board shall issue ground water withdrawal permits for the total amount of ground water withdrawn during any consecutive twelve-month period between July 1, 1988, and June 30, 1993, together with such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation.

Persons holding a permit to withdraw ground water issued on or after July 1, 1991, and prior to July 1, 1992, in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas shall not be required to apply for a ground water withdrawal permit until the expiration of the term of the permit to withdraw ground water as provided in subsection C of §

62.1-266

, and may withdraw ground water pursuant to the terms and conditions of the permit to withdraw ground water. Such persons may apply for a ground water withdrawal permit allowing greater withdrawals of ground water than are allowed under an existing permit, and the Board in its discretion may issue a permit for such greater withdrawals, upon consideration of the factors set forth in §

62.1-263

.

Persons holding a certificate of ground water right issued prior to July 1, 1992, or a permit to withdraw ground water issued prior to July 1, 1991, in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas, who have not withdrawn ground water prior to July 1, 1992, may initiate a withdrawal on or after July 1, 1992, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the certificate or permit. The persons shall file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit on or before December 31, 1995, and may continue withdrawing ground water under the terms and conditions of their certificate or permit until the required ground water withdrawal permit application is acted on by the Board, provided that the ground water withdrawal permit application is filed on or before December 31, 1995. The Board shall issue a ground water withdrawal permit for the total amount of ground water withdrawn and applied to a beneficial use during any consecutive twelve-month period between July 1, 1992, and June 30, 1995, together with (i) such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation and (ii) such amount as the Board in its discretion deems appropriate upon consideration of the factors set forth in §

62.1-263

. This subsection shall not apply to a political subdivision, or an authority serving a political subdivision, holding a permit or certificate for a public water supply well for supplemental water during drought conditions, which shall apply for a ground water withdrawal permit as provided in §

62.1-265

.

Persons withdrawing ground water for agricultural or livestock watering purposes in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas on or before July 1, 1992, shall file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit on or before December 31, 1993, in order to obtain a permit for withdrawals. The Board shall issue ground water withdrawal permits for the total amount of ground water withdrawn during any consecutive twelve-month period between July 1, 1983 and June 30, 1993, together with such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation.

Persons withdrawing ground water for agricultural or livestock watering purposes, or pursuant to certificates of ground water right or permits to withdraw ground water issued prior to July 1, 1992, in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas, may continue such withdrawal until the required permit application is acted on by the Board, provided that the permit application is filed by the appropriate deadline.

Persons applying for a ground water withdrawal permit may request that they be permitted to withdraw more ground water than the amount to which they may be entitled based on their historic usage and water conservation as set forth in this section. The Board in its discretion may issue a permit for a greater amount than that which is based on historic usage and water conservation, upon consideration of the factors set forth in §

62.1-263

.

Failure by any person covered by the provisions of subsection A, B, D or E to file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit prior to the expiration of the applicable period creates a presumption that any claim to withdraw ground water based on history of usage has been abandoned. In reviewing any application for a ground water withdrawal permit subsequently made by such a person, the Board shall consider the factors set forth in §

62.1-263

.

History.

1992, c. 812; 1994, cc. 513, 592.

§ 62.1-261.
Permits for existing ground water withdrawals in newly established ground water management areas.

Persons withdrawing ground water in any area declared a ground water management area on or after July 1, 1992, shall file an application within six months after the ground water management area has been declared in order to obtain a permit for withdrawals. The Board shall issue permits for the total amount of ground water withdrawn during any consecutive twelve-month period in the five years preceding said declaration, together with such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation.

Persons withdrawing ground water for agricultural or livestock watering purposes in any area declared a ground water management area on or after July 1, 1992, shall file an application within six months after the ground water management area has been declared in order to obtain a permit for withdrawals. The Board shall issue permits for the total amount of ground water withdrawn during any consecutive twelve-month period in the ten-year period preceding such declaration, together with such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation.

Persons withdrawing ground water in any area declared a ground water management area on or after July 1, 1992, may continue such withdrawal until the required permit application is acted on by the Board, provided that the permit application is filed within the six-month period following the declaration.

Persons applying for a ground water withdrawal permit issued pursuant to this section may request that they be permitted to withdraw more ground water than the amount to which they may be entitled based on their historic usage as set forth in this section. The Board in its discretion may issue a permit for a greater amount than that which is based on historic usage, upon consideration of factors set forth in §

62.1-263

.

Failure by any person covered by the provisions of subsection A or B to file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit within the six months following the declaration of the ground water management area creates a presumption that any claim to withdraw ground water based on history of usage has been abandoned. In reviewing any application for a ground water withdrawal permit subsequently made by such a person, the Board shall consider the factors set forth in §

62.1-263

.

History.

1992, c. 812.

§ 62.1-262.
(For contingent expiration date, see Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100) Permits for other ground water withdrawals.

Any application for a ground water withdrawal permit, except as provided in §§

62.1-260

and

62.1-261

and subsection H of §

62.1-266

, shall include a water conservation and management plan approved by the Board. A water conservation and management plan shall include: (i) use of water-saving plumbing and processes including, where appropriate, use of water-saving fixtures in new and renovated plumbing as provided under the Uniform Statewide Building Code; (ii) a water-loss reduction program; (iii) a water-use education program; and (iv) mandatory reductions during water-shortage emergencies including, where appropriate, ordinances prohibiting waste of water generally and providing for mandatory water-use restrictions, with penalties, during water-shortage emergencies. The Board shall approve all water conservation plans in compliance with clauses (i) through (iv).

History.

1992, c. 812; 2020, c. 670.

Section set out twice.

This section is effective until amendments by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100 take effect pursuant to Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100, cl. 3. For this section as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100 see the following section, also numbered

62.1-262

.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 670, in the first sentence, inserted “and subsection H of §

62.1-266

” and in the second sentence, substituted “clauses (i) through (iv)” for “subdivisions (i) through (iv) of this section.”

§ 62.1-262.
(For contingent effective date, see Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100) Permits for other ground water withdrawals.

Any application for a ground water withdrawal permit, except as provided in §

62.1-260

or

62.1-261

or subsection H of §

62.1-266

, shall include a water conservation and management plan approved by the Board. Such water conservation and management plan shall include (i) the use of water-saving plumbing and processes including, where appropriate, water-saving fixtures in new and renovated plumbing as provided under the Uniform Statewide Building Code; (ii) a water-loss reduction program; (iii) a water-use education program; (iv) a water auditing plan that complies with requirements established by the Board in regulations; (v) a leak detection and repair plan that complies with requirements established by the Board in regulations; and (vi) mandatory reductions during water-shortage emergencies, including, where appropriate, ordinances prohibiting waste of water generally and providing for mandatory water-use restrictions, with penalties, during water-shortage emergencies. The Board shall approve any water conservation plan that complies with clauses (i) through (vi). Once approved by the Board, such water conservation and management plan shall be incorporated by reference as a condition in the ground water withdrawal permit. The Board shall not issue a ground water withdrawal permit, except as provided in §

62.1-260

or

62.1-261

or subsection H of §

62.1-266

, without an approved water conservation and management plan.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2020, c. 670; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100.

Section set out twice.

This section is set out as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100. For this section effective until the amendments by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100 take effect see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-262

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 100, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the second enactment of this act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 100, in the first sentence, substituted “provided in §

62.1-260

or

62.1-261

or subsection H” for “provided in §§

62.1-260

and

62.1-261

and subsection H”; in clause (i) deleted “use of” preceding “water-saving fixtures”; inserted clauses (iv) and (v) and redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (vi); in the third sentence substituted “any water conservation plan that complies” for “all water conservation plans in compliance” and “clauses (i) through (vi)” for “clauses (i) through (iv)”; and added the last two sentences. For contingent effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-262.1.
Permits for withdrawals from Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Area.

The Board shall adopt regulations to provide incentives for the withdrawal of ground water from the surficial aquifer in the Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Area rather than from the deep aquifer in such management area. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of §

62.1-266

, such incentives may include extended permit terms of as long as 20 years, an accelerated permit process, discounted permit fees, other subsidies, or other incentives.

History.

2019, c. 755.

§ 62.1-263.
Criteria for issuance of permits.

When reviewing an application for a permit to withdraw ground water, or an amendment to a permit, the Board may consider the nature of the proposed beneficial use, the proposed use of alternate or innovative approaches such as aquifer storage and recovery systems and surface and ground water conjunctive uses, climatic cycles, unique requirements for nuclear power stations, economic cycles, population projections, the status of land use and other necessary approvals, and the adoption and implementation of the applicant’s water conservation and management plan. In no case shall a permit be issued for more ground water than can be applied to the proposed beneficial use.

When proposed uses of ground water are in conflict or when available supplies of ground water are insufficient for all who desire to use them, preference shall be given to uses for human consumption, over all others.

In evaluating permit applications, the Board shall ensure that the maximum possible safe supply of ground water will be preserved and protected for all other beneficial uses.

In evaluating the available ground water with respect to permit applications for new or expanded withdrawals in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas, the Board shall use the average of the actual historical ground water usage from the inception of the ground water withdrawals of a political subdivision or authority operating a ground water and surface water conjunctive use system and shall not use the total permit capacity of such system in determining such availability.

History.

1992, c. 812; 1994, cc. 513, 592.

§ 62.1-263.1.
Permit rationale.

In granting a permit pursuant to this chapter, the Department shall provide in writing a clear and concise statement of the legal basis, scientific rationale, and justification for the decision reached. When the decision of the Department is to deny a permit pursuant to this chapter, the Department shall, in consultation with legal counsel, provide a clear and concise statement explaining the reason for the denial, the scientific justification for the same, and how the Department’s decision is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Copies of the decision, certified by the Director, shall be mailed by certified mail to the permittee or applicant.

History.

2022, c. 356.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 356, cl. 3 provides: “That any permits or orders issued by the Air Pollution Control Board or the State Water Control Board prior to the effective date of this act shall continue in full force and are enforceable by the Department of Environmental Quality.”

§ 62.1-264.
Permits for public water supplies.

To ensure that any ground water withdrawal permit issued for a public water supply does not impact a waterworks operation permit issued pursuant to §

32.1-172

, the maximum permitted daily withdrawal shall be set by the Board at a level consistent with the requirements and conditions contained in the waterworks operation permit.
This section shall not limit the authority of the Board to reduce or eliminate ground water withdrawals by a waterworks if necessary to protect human health or the environment.
In promulgating regulations to implement this section, and in administering such regulations and this chapter, the Board shall consult and cooperate with the State Health Department to the end that effective, equitable management of ground water and safeguarding of public health will be attained to the maximum extent possible.

History.

1992, c. 812.

§ 62.1-265.
Drought relief wells.

A political subdivision, or an authority serving a political subdivision, holding a certificate of ground water right issued prior to July 1, 1992, or a permit to withdraw ground water issued prior to July 1, 1992, in the Eastern Virginia or Eastern Shore Groundwater Management Areas, for the operation of a public water supply well for the purpose of providing supplemental water during drought conditions, shall file an application for a ground water withdrawal permit on or before December 31, 1992.
The Board shall issue ground water withdrawal permits for supplemental drought relief wells for the amount of ground water needed annually to meet human consumption needs as documented by a water conservation and management plan approved by the Board as provided in §

62.1-262

.
Any ground water withdrawal permits for supplemental drought relief wells shall be issued with the condition that withdrawals may only be made at times that mandatory water use restrictions have been implemented pursuant to the water conservation and management plan.

History.

1992, c. 812.